Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3004.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 582, as
amended by Section 1, Chapter 252, O.S.L. 2023 (59 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 582), is amended to read as follows:
Section 582. There is hereby re-created, to continue until July
1, 2026 2031, in accordance with the provisions of the Oklahoma
Sunset Law, the Board of Examiners in Optometry. This Board shall
consist of five (5) persons, four of whom shall possess sufficient
knowledge of theoretical and practical optics to practice optometry,
be duly licensed as optometrists, and who shall have been residents
of this state actually engaged in the practice of optometry for at
least five (5) years. The term of each licensed optometrist member
of the Board, one being appointed each year, shall be five (5)
years, or until a qualified successor is appointed. The lay member
of the Board shall serve a term coterminous with that of the
Governor and shall serve at the pleasure of the Governor. The
Governor is hereby authorized to appoint a member of the Board of
Examiners in Optometry at the expiration of any term or whenever,

for any reason, a vacancy may occur on the Board. Vacancies shall
be filled for the unexpired term only.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
ENR. H. B. NO. 3004 Page 2

Passed the House of Representatives the 12th day of March, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 20th day of April, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 3004 Page 3